Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2319.01
Board of directors; duties; report.

The board of directors shall assess the effectiveness of enforcement programs, enforcement actions, and its damage prevention and public awareness programs and make a report to the Governor and the Legislature no later than December 1, 2021, and by December 1 every odd-numbered year thereafter. The report to the Legislature shall be made electronically.

Laws 2019, LB462, § 11.